Utah statutes.
67-5-30.   Mortgage and Financial Fraud Unit creation -- Duties -- Employment of staff.

(1)  The attorney general may assist in efforts to prevent, investigate, and prosecute mortgage fraud, as described in Section 76-6-1203, and other financial fraud, including working with other agencies of state and local government.

(2)  There is created within the Office of the Attorney General the Mortgage and Financial Fraud Unit to investigate and prosecute cases of mortgage fraud and other financial fraud.

(3)  The Mortgage and Financial Fraud Unit shall focus its efforts on detecting, investigating, deterring, and prosecuting mortgage fraud and other major financial fraud crimes.

(4)  The attorney general may employ investigators, prosecutors, and necessary support staff for the unit created under Subsection (2).



Enacted by Chapter 350, 2012 General Session

